Washington statutes.
RCW 19.182.190

Security freeze—RCW 19.182.170 not applicable to certain consumer reporting agencies.

A consumer reporting agency is not required to place a security freeze in a consumer credit report under RCW 19.182.170 if it acts only as a reseller of credit information by assembling and merging information contained in the database of another consumer reporting agency or multiple consumer reporting agencies, and does not maintain a permanent database of credit information from which new consumer credit reports are produced. However, a consumer reporting agency must honor any security freeze placed on a consumer credit report by another consumer reporting agency.

[ 2005 c 342 s 3.]